Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2005
Street; common boundary with county or other municipality; concurrent and joint jurisdiction; limitation.

The city council of any city shall have concurrent and joint jurisdiction with the county board of any county and the governing body of any other municipality over any street which is contiguous to and forms a common boundary between such city and county or municipality. The city council of such city shall have the right and authority to exercise all powers over such street as it may over streets within its corporate limits with the cooperation and concurrence of the county board or the governing body of any other municipality. Nothing in this section shall be construed as granting any power of annexation which is not otherwise granted by law.

Laws 1973, LB 71, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 133.